Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 never intimidated by the number of the sheep. The United States was the mightiest military power on earth—potentially. But wars are won with bullets, not blueprints. Indeed America came perilously close to losing the war to the well-armed aggressors before it could begin to throw its full weight onto the scales. Time, in a sense, was the most needed munition. Expense was no limitation. The overpowering problem confronting America was to retool itself for all-out war production, while praying that the dictators would not meanwhile crush their adversaries who still remained in the ﬁeld—notably Britain and the Soviet Union. Haste was all the more imperative because the highly skilled German scientists might turn up with unbeatable secret weapons, including rocket bombs and perhaps even atomic arms. America’s task was far more complex and backbreaking than during World War I. It had to feed, clothe, and arm itself, as well as transport its forces to regions as far separated as Britain and Burma. More than that, it had to send a vast amount of food and munitions to its hard-pressed allies, who stretched all the way from the USSR to Australia. Could the American people, reputedly “gone soft,” measure up to this herculean task? Was democracy “rotten” and “decadent,” as the dictators sneeringly proclaimed?

The Shock of War
 National unity was no worry, thanks to the electrifying blow by the Japa nese at Pearl Harbor. American Communists had denounced the Anglo-French “imperialist” war before Hitler attacked Stalin in 1941, but they now clamored for an unmitigated assault on the Axis powers. The handful of strutting pro-Hitlerites in the United States melted away, while millions of Italian Americans and German Americans loyally supported the nation’s war program. In contrast to World War I, when the patriotism of millions of immigrants was hotly questioned, World War II actually speeded the assimilation of many ethnic groups into American society. Immigration had been choked off for almost two decades before 1941, and America’s ethnic communities were now composed of well-settled members, whose votes were crucial to Franklin Roosevelt’s Democratic party. Consequently, there was virtually no government witch-hunting of minority groups, as had happened in World War I. A painful exception was the plight of some 110,000 Japanese Americans, concentrated on the Paciﬁc Coast

 Enemy Aliens When the United States suddenly found itself at war with Germany, Italy, and Japan in December 1941, noncitizen German, Italian, and Japanese immigrants became “enemy aliens” and were required to register with the authorities. Several hundred resident Germans and Italians were detained in internment camps, but the harshest treatment was meted out to the Japanese, some 110,000 of whom, noncitizens and citizens alike, were eventually interned. Ironically, the two Japanese American Boy Scouts posting this notice in Los Angeles would soon be on their way to a government detention camp.

 (see “Makers of America: The Japanese,” pp. 878–879). The Washington top command, fearing that they might act as saboteurs for Japan in case of invasion, forcibly herded them together in concentration camps, though about two-thirds of them were American-born U.S. citizens. This brutal precaution, authorized under Executive Order No. 9066, was both unnecessary and unfair, as the loyalty and combat record of Japa nese Americans proved to be admirable. But a wave of post– Pearl Harbor hysteria, backed by the long historical swell of anti-Japa nese prejudice on the West Coast, temporarily robbed many Americans of their good sense—and their sense of justice. The internment camps deprived these uprooted Americans of dignity and basic rights; the internees also lost hundreds of millions of dollars in property and foregone earnings. The wartime Supreme Court in 1944 upheld the constitutionality of the Japa nese relocation in Korematsu v. U.S. But more than four decades later, in 1988, the U.S.

The Internment of Japanese Americans




 American song titles after Pearl Harbor combined nationalism with unabashed racism: “We Are the Sons of the Rising Guns,” “Oh, You Little Son of an Oriental,” “To Be Speciﬁc, It’s Our Paciﬁc,” “The Sun Will Soon Be Setting on the Land of the Rising Sun,” “The Japs Don’t Stand a Chinaman’s Chance,” and “We’re Gonna Find a Fellow Who Is Yellow and Beat Him Red, White, and Blue.” Monica Sone (b. 1919), a college-age Japanese American woman in Seattle, recorded the shock she and her brother felt when they learned of Executive Order No. 9066, which authorized the War Department to remove Japanese—aliens and citizens alike—from their homes:

“


Anti-Japanese Poster, World War II
 Government propaganda during the war exploited racial stereotypes, often depicting Japanese people with big teeth and poor vision.

 government ofﬁcially apologized for its actions and approved the payment of reparations of $20,000 to each camp survivor. The war prompted other changes in the American mood. Many programs of the once-popular New Deal— including the Civilian Conservation Corps, the Works Progress Administration, and the National Youth Administration—were wiped out by the conser vative Congress elected in 1942. Roosevelt declared in 1943 that “Dr. New Deal” was going into retirement, to be replaced by “Dr. Win-the-War.” His announcement acknowledged not only the urgency of the war effort but the power of the revitalized conser vative forces in the country. The era of New Deal reform was over. World War II was no idealistic crusade, as World War I had been. The Washington government did make

 In anger, Henry and I read and reread the Executive Order. Henry crumbled the newspaper in his hand and threw it against the wall. ‘Doesn’t my citizenship mean a single blessed thing to anyone? Why doesn’t somebody make up my mind for me? First they want me in the army. Now they’re going to slap an alien 4-C on me because of my ancestry. . . .’ Once more I felt like a despised, pathetic two-headed freak, a Japanese and an American, neither of which seemed to be doing me any good.

”


 some effort to propagandize at home and abroad with the Atlantic Charter, but the accent was on action. Opinion polls in 1942 revealed that nine out of ten Americans could cite no provisions of the Atlantic Charter. A majority then, and a near-majority two years later, confessed to having “no clear idea what the war is about.” All Americans knew was that they had a dirty job on their hands and that the only way out was forward. They went about their bloody task with astonishing efﬁciency.

Building the War Machine
 The war crisis caused the drooping American economy to snap to attention. Massive military orders—over $100 billion in 1942 alone—almost instantly soaked up the idle industrial capacity of the still-lingering Great Depression. Orchestrated by the War Production Board (WPB), American factories poured forth an avalanche

MAKERS OF

AMERICA
TheAfricanThe Great Japanese American Migration 
I


 n 1853 the American commodore Matthew Perry Like many Chinese and European immigrants, sailed four gunboats into Japan’s Uraga Bay and demost Japa nese who came to America expected to stay only temporarily. They planned to work hard for wages manded that the nation open itself to diplomatic and that were high by Japa nese standards and then to recommercial exchange with the United States. Perry’s turn home and buy land. In Hawaii most Japa nese arrival ended two centuries of Japan’s self-imposed labored on the vast sugar cane plantations. On the isolation and eventually led to the overthrow of the mainland they initially found migratory work on the last Japa nese shogun (military ruler) and the restorarailroads or in ﬁsh, fruit, or vegetable canneries. A seption of the emperor. Within two decades of Perry’s ararate Japa nese economy of restaurants, stores, and rival, Japan’s new “Meiji” government had launched boardinghouses soon sprang up in cities to serve the the nation on an ambitious program of industrializaimmigrants’ needs. tion and militarization designed to make it the ecoFrom such humble beginnings, many Japa nese— nomic and political equal of the Western powers. particularly those on the Paciﬁc Coast—quickly moved As Japan rapidly modernized, its citizens increasinto farming. In the late nineteenth century, the spread ingly took ship for America. A steep land tax imposed of irrigation shifted Cal i fornia agriculture from grain by the Meiji government to pay for its reforms drove to fruits and vegetables, and the invention of the remore than 300,000 Japa nese farmers off their land. In frigerated railcar opened hungry new markets in the 1884 the Meiji government permitted Hawaiian plantEast. The Japa nese, with centuries of experience in iners to recruit contract laborers from among this distensive farming, arrived just in time to take advantage placed population. By the 1890s many Japa nese were of these developments. As early as 1910, Japanese farmsailing beyond Hawaii to the ports of Long Beach, San ers produced 70 percent of Cal i fornia’s strawberries, Francisco, and Seattle. and by 1940 they grew 95 percent of the state’s snap Between 1885 and 1924, roughly 200,000 Japa nese beans and more than half of its tomatoes. One Japanese migrated to Hawaii, and around 180,000 more ventured to the U.S. mainland. They were a select group: because the Meiji government saw overseas Japa nese as representatives of their homeland, it strictly regulated emigration. Thus Japa nese immigrants to America arrived with more money than their European counterparts. Also, because of Japan’s system of compulsory education, Japa nese immigrants on average were better educated and more literate than European immigrants. Women as well as men migrated. The Japanese government, wanting to avoid the problems of an itinerant bachelor society that it observed among the Chinese in the United States, actively promoted women’s migration. Although most Japa nese immigrants were young men in their twenties and thirties, thousands of women also ventured to Hawaii and the mainland as contract laborers or “picture Campaign Against the Japanese, Hollywood, California, 1923 brides,” so called because their courtship had Long before Japanese Americans were interned during World consisted exclusively of an exchange of photo- War II as a security risk, they faced intense discrimination graphs with their prospective husbands. throughout the United States.



Japanese American Evacuees, 1942 After the U.S.
 Army’s Western Defense Command ordered the forced evacuation of all Japanese and Japanese Americans living on the Paciﬁc Coast, families had no choice but to pack up whatever they could carry and move to the “relocation centers” hastily erected farther inland.

 farmer, known as the Potato King, sent his children to Harvard and Stanford and died in 1926 with an estate valued at $15 million. But the very success of the Japa nese proved a lightning rod for trouble. On the West Coast, Japa nese immigrants had long endured racist barbs and social segregation. Increasingly, white workers and farmers, jealous of Japa nese success, pushed for immigration restrictions. Bowing to this pressure, President Theodore Roosevelt in 1908 negotiated the “Gentlemen’s Agreement,” under which the Japa nese government voluntarily agreed to limit emigration. In 1913 the Cal ifornia legislature denied Japa nese immigrants already living in the United States the right to own land. Legally barred from becoming citizens, Japa nese immigrants (the “Issei,” from the Japa nese word for ﬁrst) became more determined than ever that their American-born children (the “Nissei,” from the Japanese word for second) would reap the full beneﬁts of their birthright. Japa nese parents encouraged their children to learn Eng lish, to excel in school, and to get a college education. Many Nissei grew up in two worlds, a fact they often recognized by Americanizing their Japa nese names. Although education and acculturation did not protect the Nissei from the hysteria of World War II, those assets did give them a springboard to success in the postwar era.

Three Boys at Manzanar, by
Toyo Miyatake (1895–1979)
 Miyatake was an acclaimed Japanese American photographer with his own studio in Los Angeles before he and his family were evacuated to the Manzanar internment camp. He was determined to pursue his craft there, at ﬁrst working secretly and then with the knowledge of the authorities. His pictures are the only photographic records of daily camp life taken by an internee. The guards allowed him to step outside the barbed-wire fence to take this photograph.





Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 of weaponry: 40 billion bullets, 300,000 aircraft, 76,000 ships, 86,000 tanks, and 2.6 million machine guns. Miracle-man shipbuilder Henry J. Kaiser was dubbed “Sir Launchalot” for his prodigies of ship construction; one of his ships was fully assembled in fourteen days, complete with life jackets and coat hangers. The War Production Board halted the manufacture of nonessential items such as passenger cars. It assigned priorities for transportation and access to raw materials. When the Japa nese invasion of British Ma-

The Four Freedoms, by Norman Rockwell
 In his January 6, 1941, speech to Congress requesting lend-lease aid to the Allies, President Roosevelt spoke eloquently of the “four freedoms” then threatened by Nazi and Japanese aggression. They are here given pictorial representation by Norman Rockwell, probably the most popular and best-loved American artist of the time.

 laya and the Dutch East Indies snapped America’s lifeline of natural rubber, the government imposed a national speed limit and gasoline rationing in order to conserve rubber and built ﬁ fty-one synthetic-rubber plants. By war’s end they were far outproducing the prewar supply. Farmers, too, rolled up their sleeves and increased their output. The armed forces drained the farms of workers, but heavy new investment in agricultural machinery and improved fertilizers more than made up the difference. In 1944 and 1945, blue-jeaned farmers hauled in record-breaking billion-bushel wheat harvests. These wonders of production also brought economic strains. Full employment and scarce consumer goods fueled a sharp inﬂationary surge in 1942. The Ofﬁce of Price Administration (OPA) eventually brought ascending prices under control with extensive regulations. Rationing held down the consumption of critical goods such as meat and butter, though some “black marketeers” and “meatleggers” cheated the system. The National War Labor Board (NWLB) imposed ceilings on wage increases. Labor unions, whose membership grew from about 10 million to more than 13 million workers during the war, ﬁercely resented the government-dictated wage ceilings. Despite the no-strike pledges of most of the major unions, a rash of labor walkouts plagued the war effort. Prominent among the strikers were the United Mine Workers, who several times were called off the job by their crusty and iron-willed chieftain, John L. Lewis. Threats of lost production through strikes became so worrisome that Congress, in June 1943, passed the Smith-Connally Anti-Strike Act. This act authorized the federal government to seize and operate tied-up industries. Strikes against any government-operated industry were made a criminal offense. Under the act, Washington took over the coal mines and, for a brief period, the railroads. Yet work stoppages, although dangerous, actually accounted for less than 1 percent of the total working hours of the United States’ wartime laboring force—a record better than blockaded Britain’s. American workers, on the whole, were commendably committed to the war effort.

Manpower and Womanpower
 The armed ser vices enlisted nearly 15 million men in World War II and some 216,000 women, who were em-

Mobilizing the Economy


 Poster appeals and slogans urging women to enlist in the WAACs (Women’s Army Auxiliary Corps) were “Speed Them Back, Join the WAAC,” “I’d Rather Be with Them—Than Waiting for Them,” “Back the Attack, Be a WAAC! For America Is Calling,” and (a song throwback to World War I) “The WAACs and WAVES Will Win the War, Parlez Vous.”

 ployed for noncombat duties. Best known of these “women in arms” were the WAACs (army), WAVES (navy), and SPARs (Coast Guard). As the draft net was tightened after Pearl Harbor, millions of young men were plucked from their homes and clothed in “GI” (government issue) outﬁts. As the arsenal of democracy, the United States exempted certain key catego-



 ries of industrial and agricultural workers from the draft, in order to keep its mighty industrial and foodproducing machines humming. But even with these exemptions, the draft left the nation’s farms and factories so short of personnel that new workers had to be found. An agreement with Mexico in 1942 brought thousands of Mexican agricultural workers, called braceros, across the border to harvest the fruit and grain crops of the West. The Bracero program outlived the war by some twenty years, becoming a ﬁ xed feature of the agricultural economy in many western states. Even more dramatic was the march of women onto the factory ﬂoor. More than 6 million women took up jobs outside the home; over half of them had never before worked for wages. Many of them were mothers, and the government was obliged to set up some 3,000 daycare centers to care for “Rosie the Riveter’s” children

 War Workers More than 6 million women—more than 3 million of them homemakers who had never before worked for wages—entered the work force during World War II. In contrast to the experience of women workers in World War I, many of these newly employed women continued as wage workers after the war ended.



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 while she drilled the fuselage of a heavy bomber or joined the links of a tank track. When the war ended, Rosie and many of her sisters were in no hurry to put down their tools. They wanted to keep on working and often did. The war thus foreshadowed an eventual revolution in the roles of women in American society. Yet the war’s immediate impact on women’s lives has frequently been exaggerated. The great majority of American women—especially those with husbands present in the home or with small children to care for—did not work for wages in the wartime economy but continued in their traditional roles. In both Britain and the Soviet Union, a far greater percentage of women, including mothers, were pressed into industrial employment as the gods of war laid a much heavier hand on those societies than they did on the United States. A poll in 1943 revealed that a majority of American women would not take a job in a war plant if it were offered. At war’s end, two-thirds of women war workers left the labor force. Many of them were forced out of their jobs by employers and unions eager to reemploy returning ser vicemen. But half of them told census takers that they quit their jobs voluntarily because of family obligations. The immediate postwar period witnessed not a permanent widening of women’s employment opportunities, but a widespread rush into suburban domesticity and the mothering of the “baby boomers,” who were born by the tens of millions in the decade and a half after 1945. America was destined to experience a thoroughgoing revolution in women’s status later in the postwar period, but that epochal change was only beginning to gather momentum in the war years.

 $6 billion of federally ﬁ nanced industrial facilities. Here were the seeds of the postwar blossoming of the “Sunbelt” (see Map 35.1). Despite this economic stimulus in the South, some 1.6 million blacks left the land of their ancient enslavement to seek jobs in the war plants of the West and North. Forever after, race relations constituted a national, not a regional, issue. Explosive tensions developed over employment, housing, and segregated facilities. Black leader A. Philip Randolph, head of the Brotherhood of Sleeping Car Porters, threatened a massive “Negro March on Washington” in 1941 to demand

Wartime Migrations
 The war also proved to be a demographic cauldron, churning and shifting the American population. Many of the 15 million men and women in uniform, having seen new sights and glimpsed new horizons, chose not to go home again at war’s end. War industries sucked people into boomtowns like Los Angeles, Detroit, Seattle, and Baton Rouge. Cal i fornia’s population grew by nearly 2 million. The South experienced especially dramatic changes. Franklin Roosevelt had called the South “the nation’s number one economic problem” in 1938; when war came, he seized the opportunity to accelerate the region’s economic development. The states of the old Confederacy received a disproportionate share of defense contracts, including nearly

 Segregation in the Military A white ofﬁcer reviews the 99th Pursuit Squadron, the famed “Tuskegee Airmen.” They ﬂew more than sixteen hundred ﬁghtersupport missions in North Africa and compiled an outstanding record, never losing a bomber to enemy aircraft. But these ﬂiers were among the few African Americans who saw combat duty in World War II, when a still strictly segregated military assigned most blacks to construction, longshoreman, and mess-hall service.

Population Shifts


 equal opportunities for blacks in war jobs and in the armed forces. Roosevelt’s response was to issue an executive order forbidding discrimination in defense industries. In addition, the president established the Fair Employment Practices Commission (FEPC) to monitor compliance with his edict. Blacks were also drafted into the armed forces, though they were still generally assigned to ser vice branches rather than combat units and subjected to petty degradations such as segregated blood banks for the wounded. But in general the war helped to embolden blacks in their long struggle for equality. They rallied behind the slogan “Double V”—victory over the dictators abroad and over racism at home. Membership in the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP) shot up almost to the half-million mark, and a new

,0


NORTH WEST

“


 Why is it we Negro soldiers who are as much a part of Uncle Sam’s great military machine as any cannot be treated with equality and the respect due us? The same respect which white soldiers expect and demand from us? . . . There is great need for drastic change in this man’s Army! How can we be trained to protect America, which is called a free nation, when all around us rears the ugly head of segregation?

”


Detroit
New York




Washington, D.C.
Denver




64 0


0,0


San Francisco


 An African American soldier angrily complained about segregation in the armed forces during World War II:



910,000


,000


Los Angeles
San Diego


,0




Memphis
,00




 SOUTH

Fort Worth
Dallas


 Average population increase of fast-growing cities, 1940–1950

Baton
Rouge




Mobile


Houston


Over 400,000
200,000–400,000
100,000–200,000
50,000–100,000


Map 35.1 Internal Migration in the United States During World War II
 Few events in American history have moved the American people about so massively as World War II. The West and the South boomed, and several warindustry cities grew explosively. A majority of migrants from the South were blacks; 1.6 million African Americans left the region in the 1940s. (Source: United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.) Interactive Map



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 arms. More than 90 percent of Indians resided on reservations in 1940; six decades later more than half lived in cities, with a large concentration in southern Cal i fornia. Some twenty-ﬁve thousand Native American men served in the armed forces. Comanches in Europe and Navajos in the Paciﬁc made especially valuable contributions as “code talkers.” They transmitted radio messages in their native languages, which were incomprehensible to the Germans and the Japa nese. The sudden rubbing against one another of unfamiliar peoples produced some distressingly violent friction. In 1943 young “zoot-suit”–clad Mexicans and Mexican Americans in Los Angeles were viciously attacked by Anglo sailors who cruised the streets in taxicabs searching for victims. Order was restored only Navajo Code Talkers, 1943 One of the best-kept secrets of World War II was the use of the Navajo language in a Marine Corps code designed to confuse the Japanese. Two marines in the leatherneck unit made up of Native Americans from Arizona and New Mexico transmitted in code during the battle for Bougainville Island in the South Paciﬁc in 1943.

 militant organization committed to nonviolent “direct action,” the Congress of Racial Equality (CORE), was founded in 1942. The northward migration of African Americans accelerated after the war, thanks to the advent of the mechanical cotton picker—an invention whose impact rivaled that of Eli Whitney’s cotton gin. Introduced in 1944, this new mechanical marvel did the work of ﬁ fty people at about one-eighth the cost. Overnight, the Cotton South’s historic need for cheap labor disappeared. Their muscle no longer required in Dixie, some 5 million black tenant farmers and sharecroppers headed north in the three decades after the war. Theirs was one of the great migrations in American history, comparable in size to the immigrant ﬂoods from Ireland, Italy, and Poland. Within a single generation, a near-majority of African Americans gave up their historic homeland and their rural way of life. By 1970 half of all blacks lived outside the South, and urban had become almost a synonym for black. The speed and scale of these changes jolted the migrants and sometimes convulsed the communities that received them. The war also prompted an exodus of Native Americans from the reservations. Thousands of Indian men and women found war work in the major cities, and thousands more answered Uncle Sam’s call to

 “Let John Henry Go” This image from the cover of the National Urban League’s publication Opportunity reﬂects the rising militancy of African Americans in the World War II era. That militancy helped to energize the civil rights movement in the postwar years.

Economics on the Home Front


 after the Mexican ambassador made an emotional plea, pointing out that such outbreaks were grist for Nazi propaganda mills. At almost the same time, an even more brutal race riot that killed twenty-ﬁve blacks and nine whites erupted in Detroit.

Holding the Home Front
 Despite these ugly episodes, Americans on the home front suffered little from the war, compared to the peoples of the other ﬁghting nations. By war’s end much of the planet was a smoking ruin. But in America the war invigorated the economy and lifted the country out of a decade-long depression. The gross national product vaulted from less than $100 billion in 1940 to more than $200 billion in 1945. Corporate proﬁts rose from about $6 billion in 1940 to almost twice that amount four years later. (“If you are going to try to go to war in a capitalist country,” said Secretary of War Henry Stimson, “you have to let business make money out of the process, or business won’t work.”) Despite wage ceilings, overtime pay fattened pay envelopes. Disposable personal income, even after payment of wartime taxes, more than doubled. On December 7, 1944, the third anniversary of Pearl Harbor, Macy’s department store rang up the biggest sales day in its history. Americans had never had it so good—and they wanted it a lot better. When price controls were ﬁnally lifted in 1946, America’s pent-up lust to consume pushed prices up 33 percent in less than two years. The rest of the world, meanwhile, was still clawing its way out from under the rubble of war.



 The hand of government touched more American lives more intimately during the war than ever before. The war, perhaps even more than the New Deal, pointed the way to the post-1945 era of big-government interventionism. Every household felt the constraints of the rationing system. Millions of men and women worked for Uncle Sam in the armed forces. Millions more worked for him in the defense industries, where their employers and unions were monitored by the FEPC and the NWLB, and their personal needs were cared for by government-sponsored housing projects, day-care facilities, and health plans. The Ofﬁce of Scientiﬁc Research and Development channeled hundreds of millions of dollars into university-based scientiﬁc research, establishing the partnership between the government and universities that underwrote America’s technological and economic leadership in the postwar era. The ﬂood of war dollars—not the relatively modest rivulet of New Deal spending—at last swept the plague of unemployment from the land. War, not enlightened social policy, cured the depression. As the postwar economy continued to depend dangerously on military spending for its health, many observers looked back to the years 1941–1945 as the origins of a “warfare-welfare state.” The conﬂ ict was phenomenally expensive. The wartime bill amounted to more than $330 billion—ten times the direct cost of World War I and twice as much as all previous federal spending since 1776. Roosevelt would have preferred to follow a pay-as-you-go policy to ﬁ nance the war, but the costs were simply too gigantic. The income-tax net was expanded to catch about

 Billions of dollars $269b $252b



 $257b

 $201b



 $72b $16b

 $19b





 $27b

 $33b

 $37b





 $42b















Figure 35.1 The National Debt,
 1930–1950 Contrary to much popular mythology, it was World War II, not the New Deal, that ﬁrst ballooned the national debt. The debt accumulated to still greater amounts in the 1980s and 1990s (see Figure 40.1 on p. 1042). (Source: Historical Statistics of the United States.)



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 four times as many people as before, and maximum tax rates rose as high as 90 percent. But despite such drastic mea sures, only about two-ﬁ fths of the war costs were paid from current revenues. The remainder was borrowed. The national debt skyrocketed from $49 billion in 1941 to $259 billion in 1945 (see Figure 35.1). When production ﬁ nally slipped into high gear, the war was costing about $10 million an hour. This was the price of victory over such implacable enemies.

April, 1942
Route of Bataan
Death March


Luzon
BATAAN 119°E PENINSULA N

Mariveles


Manila


Manila
Bay


Lamon
Bay


Corregidor
Island




 The Rising Sun in the Paciﬁc Early successes of the efﬁcient Japa nese militarists were breathtaking: they realized that they would have to win quickly or lose slowly. Seldom, if ever, has so much territory been conquered so rapidly with so little loss. Simultaneously with the assault on Pearl Harbor, the Japa nese launched widespread and uniformly successful attacks on various Far Eastern bastions. These included the American outposts of Guam, Wake, and the Philippines. In a dismayingly short time, the Japanese invader seized not only the British-Chinese port of Hong Kong but also British Malaya, with its critically important supplies of rubber and tin. Nor did the Japa nese tide stop there. The overambitious soldiers of the emperor, plunging into the snakeinfested jungles of Burma, cut the famed Burma Road. This was the route over which the United States had been trucking a trickle of munitions to the armies of the Chinese generalissimo Jiang Jieshi (Chiang Kaishek), who was still resisting the Japa nese invader in China. Thereafter, intrepid American aviators were forced to ﬂy a handful of war supplies to Jiang “over the hump” of the towering Himalaya mountains from the India-Burma theater. Meanwhile, the Japa nese had lunged southward against the oil-rich Dutch East Indies. The jungle-matted islands speedily fell to the assailants after the combined British, Australian, Dutch, and American naval and air forces had been smashed at an early date by their numerically superior foe. Better news came from the Philippines, which succeeded dramatically in slowing down the mikado’s warriors for ﬁve months. The Japa nese promptly landed a small but effective army, and General Douglas MacArthur, the eloquent and egotistical American commander, withdrew to a strong defensive position at Bataan, not far from Manila. There about twenty thousand American troops, supported by a much larger force of ill-trained Filipinos, held off violent Japa nese

15°N


San Fernando




30 Km.


30 Mi.


14°N


Philippine Is.
Mindoro
120°E


Map 35.2 Corregidor and Bataan
Interactive Map


 attacks until April 9, 1942. The defenders, reduced to eating mules and monkeys, heroically traded their lives for time in the face of hopeless odds. They grimly joked while vainly hoping for reinforcements: We’re the battling bastards of Bataan; No Mamma, no Papa, no Uncle Sam. Before the inevitable American surrender, General MacArthur was ordered by Washington to depart secretly for Australia, there to head the resistance against the Japa nese. Leaving by motorboat and airplane, he proclaimed, “I shall return.” After the battered remnants of his army had hoisted the white ﬂag, they were treated with vicious cruelty in the infamous eightymile Bataan Death March to prisoner-of-war camps— the ﬁ rst in a series of atrocities committed by both sides in the unusually savage Paciﬁc war. The island fortress of Corregidor, in Manila harbor, held out until May 6, 1942, when it too surrendered and left Japa nese forces in complete control of the Philippine archipelago (see Map 35.2).

 Japan’s High Tide at Midway The aggressive warriors from Japan, making hay while the Rising Sun shone, pushed relentlessly southward.

 The Paciﬁc Theater

 They invaded the turtle-shaped island of New Guinea, north of Australia, and landed on the Solomon Islands, from which they threatened Australia itself. Their onrush was ﬁ nally checked by a crucial naval battle fought in the Coral Sea, in May 1942. An American carrier task force, with Australian support, inﬂicted heavy losses on the victory-ﬂushed Japa nese. For the ﬁ rst time in history, the ﬁghting was all done by carrierbased aircraft, and neither ﬂeet saw or ﬁ red a shot directly at the other.



 Japan next undertook to seize Midway Island, more than a thousand miles northwest of Honolulu. From this strategic base, it could launch devastating assaults on Pearl Harbor and perhaps force the weakened American Paciﬁc ﬂeet into destructive combat—possibly even compel the United States to negotiate a ceaseﬁ re in the Paciﬁc. The epochal Battle of Midway was fought on June 3–6, 1942. Admiral Chester W. Nimitz, a high-grade naval strategist, directed a smaller but skillfully maneuvered carrier force, under Admiral Raymond A. Spruance, against the powerful invading ﬂeet. The ﬁghting was all done by aircraft, and the Japa nese broke off action after losing four vitally important carriers. Midway was a pivotal victory. Combined with the Battle of the Coral Sea, the U.S. success at Midway halted Japan’s juggernaut. But the thrust of the Japanese into the eastern Paciﬁc did net them America’s fog-girt islands of Kiska and Attu, in the Aleutian archipelago, off Alaska. This easy conquest aroused fear of an invasion of the United States from the northwest. Much American strength was consequently diverted to the defense of Alaska, including the construction of the “Alcan” Highway through Canada. Yet the Japanese imperialists, overextended in 1942, suffered from “victory disease.” Their appetites were bigger than their stomachs. If they had only dug in and consolidated their gains, they would have been much more difﬁcult to dislodge once the tide turned.

American Leapfrogging
Toward Tokyo


 Hell in the Paciﬁc Assaulting Japanese island fortresses in the Paciﬁc was a bloody, costly business. These American soldiers perished as they stepped ashore at Buna beach in New Guinea in 1942. Their damaged landing craft wallows in the surf behind them. Appearing in Life magazine on September 20, 1943, nearly two years after Pearl Harbor, this was the ﬁrst photograph of dead GIs that the War Department allowed to be published.

 Following the heartening victory at Midway, the United States for the ﬁ rst time was able to seize the initiative in the Paciﬁc. In August 1942 American ground forces gained a toehold on Guadalcanal Island, in the Solomons, in an effort to protect the lifeline from America to Australia through the southwest Paciﬁc. An early naval defeat inﬂ icted by the Japa nese shortened American supplies dangerously, and for weeks the U.S. troops held on to the malarial island by their ﬁ ngernails. After several desperate sea battles for naval control, the Japa nese troops evacuated Guadalcanal in February 1943. Japa nese losses were 20,000, compared to 1,700 for the Americans. That casualty ratio of more than ten to one, Japa nese to American, persisted throughout the Paciﬁc war. American and Australian forces, under General MacArthur, meanwhile had been hanging on courageously



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 to the southeastern tip of New Guinea, the last buffer protecting Australia. The scales of war gradually began to tip as the American navy, including submarines, inﬂ icted lethal losses on Japa nese supply ships and troop carriers. Conquest of the north coast of New Guinea was completed by August 1944, after General MacArthur had fought his way westward through tropical jungle hells. This hard-won victory was the ﬁrst leg of his long return journey to the Philippines. The U.S. Navy, with marines and army divisions doing the meat-grinder ﬁghting, had meanwhile been “leapfrogging” the Japa nese-held islands in the Paciﬁc. Old-fashioned strategy dictated that the American forces, as they drove toward Tokyo, should reduce the fortiﬁed Japa nese outposts on their ﬂank. This course would have taken many bloodstained months, for the holed-in defenders were prepared to die to the last man in their caves. The new strategy of island hopping called for bypassing some of the most heavily fortiﬁed Japa nese posts, capturing nearby islands,

 setting up airﬁelds on them, and then neutralizing the enemy bases through heavy bombing. Deprived of essential supplies from the homeland, Japan’s outposts would slowly wither on the vine—as they did. Brilliant success crowned the American attacks on the Japa nese island strongholds in the Paciﬁc, where Admiral Nimitz skillfully coordinated the efforts of naval, air, and ground units. In May and August of 1943, Attu and Kiska in the Aleutians were easily retaken. In November 1943 “bloody Tarawa” and Makin, both in the Gilbert Islands, fell after suicidal resistance. In January and February 1944, the key outposts of the Marshall Islands group succumbed after savage ﬁghting. Especially prized were the Marianas, including America’s conquered Guam. From bases in the Marianas, the United States’ new B-29 superbombers could carry out round-trip bombing raids on Japan’s home islands. The assault on the Marianas opened on June 19, 1944, with what American pilots called the

1. Defeating the Japanese in
 China by funneling supplies over the Himalayan “hump” from India. 2. Carrying the war into Southeast Asia (a proposal much favored by the British, who could thus regain Singapore). 3. Heavy bombing of Japan from Chinese air bases. 4. “Island hopping” from the South Paciﬁc to within striking distance of the Japanese home islands. This strategy, favored by General Douglas MacArthur, was the one ﬁnally emphasized. Interactive Map

 tia

Kiska I.


.)


 u A l e (U Is.

.S


Map 35.3 United States
 Thrusts in the Paciﬁc, 1942–1945 American strategists had to choose among four proposed plans for waging the war against Japan:

60°N


SI B ER IA

 n

 ALASKA

SOVI ET U N IO N

MONGOLIA MA

Attu
I.


 IA

N


40°


Hiroshima
Aug. 6, 1945


CH I NA INDIA

 NC

R
 HU

(Gr. Br.)
(Gr. Br.)


Hong
Kong


 THAILAND

(Gr. Br.)


 INDOCHINA (Vichy Fr.)

 MALAYA (Gr. Br.)

Singapore


PAC I F I C

(U.S.)


N
20°


Saipan
June 1944


Philippine Sea
June 1944


(U.S.)


Marshall
Is.


Caroline Is.


(Gr. Br.)


Tarawa
Nov. 1943


New Guinea


 Major battle Limit of Japanese conquest Japanese-held areas, 1942 U.S. advance

Solomon
Is.




160°W


AUSTRALIA 140°E 600 1,200
Km. 
1,200 Mi.


(Gr. Br.)


Guadalcanal
0°S
Aug. 1942–Feb. 1943 2


Coral Sea
May 1942


80°E


120°E


 tor Equa

Gilbert Is.


NETHERLANDS EAST INDIES

INDIAN OCEAN

Pearl Harbor
Dec. 7, 1941


Wake I.


Guam
July 1944


Leyte
Oct. 1944


O C E A N


Iwo Jima
March 1945


Philippine Is.


100°E


Hawaiian Is.
(U.S.)


Okinawa
June


 BURMA

Midway Is.
June 1942


JAPAN
Tokyo 
Nagasaki
Aug. 9, 1945


180°
160°E


40°S


0°


Battles Above and Below the Sea


 “Great Marianas Turkey Shoot.” A combination of the combat superiority of the recently developed American “Hellcat” ﬁghter plane and the new technology of the antiaircraft proximity fuse destroyed nearly 250 Japa nese aircraft, with a loss of only 29 American planes. The following day, in the Battle of the Philippine Sea, U.S. naval forces sank several Japa nese carriers. The Japa nese navy never recovered from these massive losses of planes, pilots, and ships. After fanatical resistance, including a mass suicide leap of surviving Japa nese soldiers and civilians from “Suicide Cliff” on Saipan, the major islands of the Marianas fell to the U.S. attackers in July and August 1944. With these unsinkable aircraft carriers now available, virtual round-the-clock bombing of Japan began in November 1944 (see Map 35.3).

The Allied Halting of Hitler
 Early setbacks for America in the Paciﬁc were paralleled in the Atlantic. Hitler had entered the war with a formidable ﬂeet of ultramodern submarines, which ultimately operated in “wolf packs” with frightful effect, especially in the North Atlantic, the Caribbean, and the Gulf of Mexico. During ten months of 1942 more than 500 merchant ships were reported lost— 111 in June alone—as ship destruction far outran construction. The tide of subsea battle turned with agonizing slowness. Old techniques, such as escorting convoys of merchant vessels and dropping depth bombs from destroyers, were strengthened by air patrol, the newly invented technology of radar, and the bombing of submarine bases. “Keep ’Em Sailing” was the motto of oil-begrimed merchant seamen, hundreds of whom perished as unsung heroes in icy seas. Eventually Allied antisubmarine tactics improved substantially, thanks especially to British code breakers, who had cracked the Germans’ “Enigma” codes and could therefore pinpoint the locations of the U-boats lurking in the North Atlantic. Not until the spring of 1943 did the Allies clearly have the upper hand against the U-boat. If they had not won the Battle of the Atlantic, Britain would have been forced under, and a second front could not have been launched from its island springboard. Victory over the undersea raiders was nerve-rackingly narrow. When the war ended, Hitler was about to massproduce a fearsome new submarine—one that could remain underwater indeﬁ nitely and cruise at seventeen knots when submerged.



 British prime minister Winston Churchill (1874– 1965) observed in a speech in May 1943,

“


 The proud German Army has by its sudden collapse, sudden crumbling and breaking up . . . once again proved the truth of the saying, ‘The Hun [German] is always either at your throat or at your feet.’

”


 Meanwhile, the turning point of the land-air war against Hitler had come late in 1942. The British had launched a thousand-plane raid on Cologne in May. In August 1942 they were joined by the American air force and were cascading bombs on German cities. The Germans under Marshal Erwin Rommel—the “Desert Fox”—had driven eastward across the hot sands of North Africa into Egypt, perilously close to the Suez Canal. A breakthrough would have spelled disaster for the Allies. But late in October 1942, British general Bernard Montgomery delivered a withering attack at El Alamein, west of Cairo. With the aid of several hundred hastily shipped American Sherman tanks, he speedily drove the enemy back to Tunisia, more than a thousand miles away. On the Soviet front, the unexpected successes of the red army gave a new lift to the Allied cause. In September 1942 the Russians stalled the German steamroller at rubble-strewn Stalingrad, graveyard of Hitler’s hopes. More than a score of invading divisions, caught in an icy noose, later surrendered or were “mopped up.” In November 1942 the resilient Russians unleashed a crushing counteroffensive, which was never seriously reversed. A year later Stalin had regained about twothirds of the blood-soaked Soviet motherland wrested from him by the German invader.

A
Second Front from North Africa to Rome Soviet losses were already staggering in 1942: millions of soldiers and civilians lay dead, and Hitler’s armies had overrun most of the western USSR. AngloAmerican losses at this time could be counted only in the thousands. By war’s end, the grave had closed over some 20 million Soviets, and a great swath of their country, equivalent in the United States to the area from Chicago to the Atlantic seaboard, had been laid waste. Small wonder that Kremlin leaders clamored 


Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 for a second front to divert the German strength westward. Many Americans, including FDR, were eager to begin a diversionary invasion of France in 1942 or 1943. They feared that the Soviets, unable to hold out forever against Germany, might make a separate peace as they had in 1918 and leave the Western Allies to face Hitler’s fury alone. Roosevelt rashly promised the Soviets in early 1942 that he would open a second front on the European continent by the end of the year—a promise that proved utterly impossible to keep. British military planners, remembering their appalling losses in 1914–1918, were not enthusiastic about a frontal assault on German-held France. It might end in disaster. They preferred to attack Hitler’s Fortress Europe through the “soft underbelly” of the Mediterranean. Faced with British boot-dragging and a woeful lack of resources, the Americans reluctantly agreed to postpone a massive invasion of Europe. An assault on French-held North Africa was a compromise second front, and a far cry from what the badly battered Soviets were demanding. The highly secret

 Women at War Members of the Women’s Army Corps disembark in North Africa in 1944. (Note: “Auxillary” was dropped from the name in 1943)

 attack, launched in November 1942, was headed by a gifted and easy-smiling American general, Dwight D. (“Ike”) Eisenhower, a master of orga ni zation and conciliation. As a joint Allied operation ultimately involving some 400,000 men (British, Canadian, French, and chieﬂy American) and about 850 ships, the invasion was the mightiest waterborne effort up to that time in history. After savage ﬁghting, the remnants of the German-Italian army were ﬁ nally trapped in Tu nisia and surrendered in May 1943. New blows were now planned by the Allies. At Casablanca, in newly occupied French Morocco, President Roosevelt, who had boldly ﬂown the Atlantic, met in a historic conference with Winston Churchill in January 1943. The Big Two agreed to step up the Paciﬁc war, invade Sicily, increase pressure on Italy, and insist upon an “unconditional surrender” of the enemy, a phrase earlier popularized by General Ulysses S. Grant during the Civil War. Such an unyielding policy would presumably hearten the ultrasuspicious Soviets, who professed to fear separate Allied peace negotiations. It would also forestall charges of broken armistice terms, such as had come after 1918. Paradoxically, the tough-sounding unconditional surrender declaration was an admission of the weakness of the Western Allies. Still unable in 1943 to mount the kind of second front their Soviet partner desperately demanded, the British and the Americans had little but words to offer Stalin. “Unconditional surrender” proved to be one of the most controversial moves of the war. The main criticism was that it steeled the enemy to ﬁght to a lastbunker resistance, while discouraging antiwar groups in Germany from revolting. Although there was some truth in these charges, no one can prove that “unconditional surrender” either shortened or lengthened the war. But this is known: by helping to destroy the German government utterly, the harsh policy forced a thorough postwar reconstruction. The Allied forces, victorious in Africa, now turned against the not-so-soft underbelly of Europe. Sicily fell in August 1943 after sporadic but sometimes bitter resistance. Shortly before the conquest of the island, Mussolini was deposed, and Italy surrendered unconditionally soon thereafter, in September 1943. President Roosevelt, referring to the three original Axis countries—Germany, Italy, and Japan—joked grimly that it was now one down and two to go. But if Italy dropped out of the war, the Germans did not drop out of Italy. Hitler’s well-trained troops stubbornly resisted the Allied invaders now pouring

The Road to D-Day




 sand Axis troops in Italy laid down their arms and became prisoners of war. While the Italian second front opened the Mediterranean and diverted some German divisions from the blazing Soviet and French battle lines, it also may have delayed the main Allied invasion of Europe, from Eng land across the Eng lish Channel to France, by many months—allowing more time for the Soviet army to advance into Eastern Europe.

D-Day: June 6, 1944


 The Big Two British prime minister Winston Churchill and U.S. president Franklin D. Roosevelt meet at the Casablanca conference in Morocco, January 1943.

 into the toe of the Italian boot. They also unleashed their fury against the Italians, who had turned their coats and declared war on Germany in October 1943. “Sunny Italy” proceeded to belie its name, for in the snow-covered and mud-caked mountains of its elongated peninsula occurred some of the ﬁ lthiest, bloodiest, and most frustrating ﬁghting of the war. For many months Italy appeared to be a dead end, as the Allied advance was halted by a seemingly impregnable German defense centered on the ancient monastery of Monte Cassino. After a touch-and-go assault on the Anzio beachhead, Rome was ﬁ nally taken on June 4, 1944. The tremendous cross-channel invasion of France begun two days later turned Italy into a kind of sideshow, but the Allies, limited in manpower, continued to ﬁght their way slowly and painfully into northern Italy. On May 2, 1945, only ﬁve days before Germany’s ofﬁcial surrender, several hundred thou-

 The Soviets had never ceased their clamor for an allout second front, and the time rapidly approached for Churchill, Roosevelt, and Stalin to meet in person to coordinate the promised effort. Marshal Joseph Stalin, with a careful eye on Soviet military operations, balked at leaving Moscow. President Roosevelt, who jauntily remarked in private, “I can handle that old buzzard,” was eager to confer with him. The president seemed conﬁdent that Rooseveltian charm could woo the hardened conspirator of the Kremlin from his nasty communist ways. Tehran, the capital of Iran (Persia), was ﬁnally chosen as the meeting place. To this ancient city Roosevelt riskily ﬂew, after a stopover conference in Cairo with Britain’s Churchill and China’s Jiang Jieshi regarding the war against Japan. At Tehran the discussions among Stalin, Roosevelt, and Churchill— from November 28 to December 1, 1943—progressed smoothly. Perhaps the most important achievement was agreement on broad plans, especially those for launching Soviet attacks on Germany from the east simultaneously with the prospective Allied assault from the west. Preparations for the cross-channel invasion of France were gigantic. Britain’s fast-anchored isle virtually groaned with munitions, supplies, and troops, as nearly 3 million ﬁghting men were readied. Because the United States was to provide most of the Allied warriors, the overall command was entrusted to an American, General Eisenhower. He had already distinguished himself in the North African and Mediterranean campaigns, not only for his military capacity but also for his gifts as a conciliator of clashing Allied interests. French Normandy, less heavily defended than other parts of the European coast, was pinpointed for the invasion assault. On D-Day, June 6, 1944, the enormous operation, which involved some forty-six hundred vessels, unwound. Stiff resistance was encountered from



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


Allies Landing in
Normandy, June 6, 1944
 Nine-foot ocean swells on invasion day made loading the assault landing craft, such as the one pictured here, treacherous business. Many men were injured or tossed into the sea as the bathtublike amphibious vessels bobbed wildly up and down alongside the troop transports. As the vulnerable boats churned toward the beach, some ofﬁcers led their tense, grim-faced troops in prayer. One major, recalling the remarkable Battle of Agincourt in 1415, quoted from Shakespeare’s Henry V: “He that outlives this day, and comes safe home / Will stand a tip-toe when this day is named.”

 the Germans, who had been misled by a feint into expecting the blow to fall farther north. The Allies had already achieved mastery of the air over France. They were thus able to block reinforcements by crippling the railroads, while worsening German fuel shortages by bombing gasoline-producing plants. The Allied beachhead, at ﬁrst clung to with ﬁ ngertips, was gradually enlarged, consolidated, and reinforced. After desperate ﬁghting, the invaders ﬁ nally broke out of the German iron ring that enclosed the Normandy landing zone. Most spectacular were the lunges across France by American armored divisions, brilliantly commanded by blustery and profane General George S. (“Blood ’n’ Guts”) Patton. The retreat of the German defenders was hastened when an American-French force landed in August 1944 on the southern coast of France and swept northward. With the assistance of the French “underground,” Paris was liberated in August 1944, amid exuberant manifestations of joy and gratitude. Allied forces rolled irresistibly toward Germany, and many of the Americans encountered places, like Château-Thierry, familiar to their fathers in 1918. “Lafayette, we are here again,” quipped some of the American soldiers. The ﬁ rst important German city

 Liberating France A GI from Des Moines, Iowa, receives a kiss of welcome from an elderly French couple after American troops liberated their town of St. Sauveur in August 1944.

40˚E


20˚E


0˚


60˚E


60˚N


N O R W AY


Leningrad
 besieged Sept. 1941– Jan. 19, 1944

SWEDEN N. IRELAND

 DENMARK

Battle of
 the Bulge Dec. 16, 1944– UNITED KINGDOM Jan. 31,1945

Elb
 e

 NETH.

D-Day
June 6, 1944


 BELG.

R


R.
 ine

Stalingrad
Aug. 21, 1942–
Jan. 31, 1943


 UKRAINE

C


Sea


 US

S


 ea

Balearic Is.


Monte Cassino
Salerno


Bla c k


Danube R.


˚N




 n

 Rome liberated June 4, 1944

 CAS

 ia

Aug


 p

 SERBIA

 ITALY

 CAU

 ROMANIA

 CROATIA

Corsica


Vo
 lga R.

Don


 s

VICHY FRANCE

SPAI N



 g.



March 1944


SLOVAKIA HUNGARY
Dec. 19 
 ALPS

 (occupied Nov. 1942)



Au




Moscow:
Germans
 repulsed Dec. 1941

 a

 SWITZ.

J uly 19


Od
 er Warsaw R

Germany
 surrendered May 7, 1945

Rh


F R ANCE

 v.

 POLAND

 945 GERMANY ril 1 Ap

 LUX.

No


 UNION

.


 NORMANDY

 PORTUGAL

O V I E T
. 19


 PRUSSIA (Ger.)

Berlin


Dunkirk


 Paris liberated Aug. 23, 1944

Sept


 LITHUANIA

.


London


 LATVIA

R.


AT L A N T I C OCEAN

 B altic Sea

 a R. Volg

. 19


 IRELAND

N


 ESTONIA

North
Sea


 BULGARIA

 ALBANIA (It.)

T U R K E Y


Sardinia


GREECE SPANISH MOROCCO

Casablanca


Sicily


Tunis


FRENCH MOROCCO

Kasserine Pass
Feb. 14–17, 1943


(Vichy France)


FRENCH NORTH AFRICA

July 1943
 TUNISIA

(Vichy France)
 (joined Allies Nov. 1942)

M


(Gr.)


 ed ite rran ean

(Fr.)


(Gr. Br.)


 PALESTINE

S ea


(Gr. Br.)


 l



L I B YA




500 Km.


 d Se a

Map 35.4 World War II in Europe and North Africa, 1939–1945


 The presidential campaign of 1944, which was bound to divert energy from the war program, came most awkwardly as the awful conﬂ ict roared to its climax. But the normal electoral processes continued to function, despite some loose talk of suspending them “for the duration.”

SAU DI A R A B IA

Re


(Gr. Br.)


.


R


 EGYPT

 e Nil

(Italy)


FDR:
The FourthTermite of 1944 
 TRANSJORDAN (Gr. Br.)

El Alamein
Oct. 23–Nov. 5, 1942


 Allied advances

 (Aachen) fell to the Americans in October 1944, and the days of Hitler’s “thousand-year Reich” were numbered (see Map 35.4).

Suez
Canal


 ll ll

Nov.


 IRAQ

 LEBANON

Alexandria


 Neutral nations

 Major battle

SYR IA
Cyprus 
 ll ll ll

Axis Powers
 and their Allies Axis-held, early Nov. 1942 Allied Powers and their allies

Malta
(Gr. Br.)


Rhodes
Crete (It.)






500 Mi.


Interactive Map


 Victory-starved Republicans met in Chicago with hopeful enthusiasm. They quickly nominated the short, mustachioed, and dapper Thomas E. Dewey, popular vote-getting governor of New York. Regarded as a liberal, he had already made a national reputation as a prosecutor of grafters and racketeers in New York City. His shortness and youth—he was only forty-two— had caused one veteran New Dealer to sneer that the candidate had cast his diaper into the ring. To offset Dewey’s mild internationalism, the convention nominated for the vice presidency a strong isolationist, handsome and white-maned Senator John W. Bricker of Ohio. Yet the platform called for an unstinted prosecution of the war and for the creation of a new international orga ni zation to maintain peace.



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 FDR, aging under the strain, was the “indispensable man” of the Democrats. No other major ﬁgure was available, and the war was apparently grinding to its ﬁ nale. He was nominated at Chicago on the ﬁ rst ballot by acclamation. But in a sense he was the “forgotten man” of the convention, for in view of his age, an unusual amount of attention was focused on the vice presidency. The scramble for the vice-presidential plum turned into something of a free-for-all. Henry A. Wallace, onetime “plow ’em under” secretary of agriculture, had served four years as vice president and desired a renomination. But conser vative Democrats distrusted him as an ill-balanced and unpredictable liberal. A “ditch Wallace” move developed tremendous momentum, despite the popularity of Wallace with large numbers of voters and many of the delegates. With Roosevelt’s blessing, the vice-presidential nomination ﬁ nally went to smiling and self-assured Senator Harry S Truman of Missouri (“the new Missouri Compromise”). Hitherto inconspicuous, he had recently attained national visibility as the efﬁcient chairman of a Senate committee conducting an investigation of wasteful war expenditures. Nobody had much against him or on him.

Roosevelt Defeats Dewey
 A dynamic Dewey took the offensive, for Roosevelt was too consumed with directing the war to spare much time for speechmaking. The vigorous young “crime buster,” with his beautiful baritone voice and polished diction, denounced the tired and quarrelsome “old men” in Washington. He proclaimed repeatedly that after “twelve long years” of New Dealism, it was “time for a change.” As for the war, Dewey would not alter the basic strategy but would ﬁght it better—a type of “metooism” ridiculed by the Democrats. The fourth-term issue did not ﬁgure prominently, now that the ice had been broken by Roosevelt’s third term. But “Deweyeyed” Republicans half-humorously professed to fear ﬁ fth and sixth terms by the “lifer” in the White House. In the closing weeks of the campaign, Roosevelt left his desk for the stump. He was stung by certain Republican charges, including criticism that he had sent a U.S. Navy destroyer to retrieve his pet Scottie dog, Fala. He was also eager to show himself, even in chilling rains, to spike well-founded rumors of failing health. Substantial assistance came from the new political action committee of the CIO, which was orga nized

 to get around the law banning the direct use of union funds for political purposes. Zealous CIO members, branded as communists by the Republicans, rang countless doorbells and asked, with pointed reference to the recent depression, “What were you doing in 1932?” At times Roosevelt seemed to be running again against Hoover. As in every one of his previous three campaigns, FDR was opposed by a majority of the newspapers, which were owned chieﬂy by Republicans. Roosevelt, as customary, won a sweeping victory: 432 to 99 in the Electoral College; 25,606,585 to 22,014,745 in the popular vote. Elated, he quipped that “the ﬁ rst twelve years are the hardest.” Roosevelt won primarily because the war was going well. A winning pitcher is not ordinarily pulled from the game. Foreign policy was a decisive factor with untold thousands of voters, who concluded that Roosevelt’s experienced hand was needed in fashioning a future orga ni zation for world peace. The dapper Dewey, cruelly dubbed “the little man on top of the wedding cake,” had spoken smoothly of international cooperation, but his isolationist running mate, Bricker, had implanted serious doubts. The Republican party was still suffering from the taint of isolationism fastened on it by the Hardingites.

The Last Days of Hitler
 By mid-December 1944, the month after Roosevelt’s fourth-term victory, Germany seemed to be wobbling on its last legs. The Soviet surge had penetrated eastern Germany. Allied aerial “blockbuster” bombs, making the “rubble bounce” with around-the-clock attacks, were falling like giant explosive hailstones on cities, factories, and transportation arteries. The German western front seemed about to buckle under the sledgehammer blows of the United States and its Allies. Hitler then staked every thing on one last throw of his reserves. Secretly concentrating a powerful force, he hurled it, on December 16, 1944, against the thinly held American lines in the heavily befogged and snowshrouded Ardennes Forest. His objective was the Belgian port of Antwerp, key to the Allied supply operation. Caught off guard, the outmanned Americans were driven back, creating a deep “bulge” in the Allied line. The ten-day penetration was ﬁ nally halted after the 101st Airborne Division had stood ﬁ rm at the vital bastion of Bastogne. The commander, Brigadier General A. C. McAuliffe, deﬁantly answered the German demand for surrender with one word: “Nuts.” Rein-

Franklin Roosevelt at Tehran, 1943
 n late 1943 the “Big Three” wartime leaders— British prime minister Winston Churchill, American president Franklin Roosevelt, and Soviet leader Joseph Stalin—gathered together for the ﬁ rst time. They met amid growing Soviet frustration with the British and Americans for their failure thus far to open a “second front” against Germany in Western Europe, while the Soviets continued to suffer horrendous losses in the savage ﬁghting in Eastern Europe. American military planners were eager to open a second front as soon as possible, but the British, who would necessarily have to supply most of the troops until America was fully mobilized, balked. Tension among the three leaders over the second-front plan— code-named OVERLORD, the operation that resulted in the Anglo-American invasion of Normandy on “D-Day,” June 6, 1944—is evident in this report of their discussions in the Iranian city of Tehran on

I


FIRST PLENARY MEETING, NOVEMBER 28, 1943, 4 P. M., CONFERENCE ROOM, SOVIET EMBASSY
Bohlen Minutes SECRET 
THE PRESIDENT
said as the youngest of the three present he ventured to welcome his elders. He said he wished to welcome the new members to the family circle and tell them that meetings of this character were conducted as between friends with complete frankness on all sides with nothing that was said to be made public. . . . Chief of Staff Minutes MARSHAL STALIN asked who will be the commander in this Operation Overlord. (THE PRESIDENT and PRIME MINISTER interpolated this was not yet decided.) MARSHAL STALIN continued, “Then nothing will come out of these operations.” . . . THE PRESIDENT said we again come back to the problem of the timing for OVERLORD. It was believed that it would be good for OVERLORD to take place about 1 May, or certainly not later than 15 May or 20 May, if possible. THE PRIME MINISTER said that he could not agree to that. . . . . . . He said he (the Prime Minister) was going to do everything in the power of His Majesty’s Government to begin OVERLORD at the earliest possible moment. However, he did not think that the 
 November 28, 1943. The excerpts printed here are actually taken from two separate accounts: one composed by the American diplomat and Roosevelt’s ofﬁcial translator Charles Bohlen, the other written by a military ofﬁcer on behalf of the United States Joint Chiefs of Staff. Both versions were published in Foreign Relations of the United States, a compilation of American diplomatic records since 1861. The Soviets and the British also kept their own records of the Tehran meetings, giving historians remarkably rich sources with which to reconstruct the crucial negotiations and decisions that shaped wartime diplomacy. Why might the history of diplomacy be so lavishly documented? At this meeting, what were the principal objectives that each leader pursued? How did each man address his task? In what ways was the future of the war—and the postwar world— here foreshadowed? many great possibilities in the Mediterranean should be ruthlessly cast aside as valueless merely on the question of a month’s delay in OVERLORD. MARSHAL STALIN said all the Mediterranean operations are diversions, . . . THE PRESIDENT said he found that his staff places emphasis on OVERLORD. While on the other hand the Prime Minister and his staff also emphasize OVERLORD, nevertheless the United States does not feel that OVERLORD should be put off. THE PRESIDENT questioned whether it would not be possible for the ad hoc committee to go ahead with their deliberations without any further directive and to produce an answer by tomorrow morning. MARSHAL STALIN questioned, “What can such a committee do?” He said, “We Chiefs of State have more power and more authority than a committee. General Brooke cannot force our opinions and there are many questions which can be decided only by us.” He said he would like to ask if the British are thinking seriously of OVERLORD only in order to satisfy the U.S.S.R. THE PRIME MINISTER replied that if the conditions specified at Moscow regarding OVERLORD should exist, he firmly believed it would be England’s duty to hurl every ounce of strength she had across the Channel at the Germans. THE PRESIDENT observed that in an hour a very good dinner would be awaiting all and people would be very hungry. He suggested that the staffs should meet tomorrow morning and discuss the matter. . . .





Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 forcements were rushed up, and the last-gasp Hitlerian offensive was at length bloodily stemmed in the Battle of the Bulge (see Map 35.5). In March 1945, forward-driv ing American troops reached Germany’s Rhine River, where, by incredibly good luck, they found one strategic bridge undemolished. Pressing their advantage, General Eisenhower’s troops reached the Elbe River in April 1945. There, a short distance south of Berlin, American and Soviet advance guards dramatically clasped hands amid cries of “Amerikanskie tovarishchi” (American comrades). The conquering Americans were horriﬁed to ﬁ nd blood-spattered and still-stinking concentration camps, where the German Nazis had engaged in the scientiﬁc mass murder of “undesirables,” including an estimated 6 million Jews. The Washington government had long been informed about Hitler’s campaign of genocide against the Jews and had been reprehensibly slow to take steps against it. Roosevelt’s administra-

52°N


North
Sea


4°E


American and Soviet Soldiers Meet in Germany, 1945
 Such friendly sights soon became rare as mutual suspicion deepened.

6°E


5°E


N ETH ER L AN D S


Antwerp
7°E
51°N


Brussels
Aachen


B ELG I U M


Rh
 e in

N


 s Meu

R.


 Liège

.
 eR

GERMANY
Bastogne 
50°N


F R AN C E


Th e
B u l ge
 LUX.

 Initial German line Area of maximum German advance Allied counteradvances





40 Km.


40 Mi.


Map 35.5 Battle of the Bulge, December 1944–
January 1945


Interactive Map


 tion had bolted the door against large numbers of Jewish refugees, and his military commanders declined even to bomb the rail lines that carried the victims to the camps. But until the war’s end, the full dimensions of the “Holocaust” had not been known. When the details were revealed, the whole world was aghast. The vengeful Soviets, clawing their way forward from the east, reached Berlin in April 1945. After desperate house-to-house ﬁghting, followed by an orgy of pillage and rape, they captured the bomb-shattered city. Adolf Hitler, after a hasty marriage to his mistress, committed suicide in an underground bunker on April 30, 1945. Tragedy had meanwhile struck the United States. President Roosevelt, while relaxing at Warm Springs, Georgia, suddenly died from a massive cerebral hemorrhage on April 12, 1945. The crushing burden of twelve depression and war years in the White House had ﬁnally taken its toll. Knots of confused, leaderless citizens gathered to discuss the future anxiously, as a bewildered, unbriefed Vice President Truman took the helm. On May 7, 1945, what was left of the German government surrendered unconditionally. May 8 was

German Defeat




The Horror of the Holocaust
 Although the outside world had some knowledge of the Nazi death camps before the war’s end, the full revelation of Hitler’s atrocities as the Allies overran Germany in the spring of 1945 stunned and sickened the invading troops. At General Eisenhower’s orders, German civilians were compelled to view the evidence of the Nazi regime’s genocidal crimes—though these witnesses at Buchenwald tried to look the other way, as many had done during the war itself.

 ofﬁcially proclaimed V-E (Victory in Europe) Day and was greeted with frenzied rejoicing in the Allied countries.

Japan Dies Hard
 Japan’s rickety bamboo empire meanwhile was tottering to its fall. American submarines—“the silent service”—were sending the Japa nese merchant marine to the bottom so fast they were running out of prey. All told, these “undersea craft” destroyed 1,042 ships, or about 50 percent of Japan’s entire life-sustaining merchant ﬂeet. Giant bomber attacks were more spectacular. Launched from Saipan and other captured Mariana Islands, they were reducing the enemy’s fragile cities to cinders. The massive ﬁ rebomb raid on Tokyo, March 9–10, 1945, was annihilating. It destroyed over 250,000 buildings, gutted a quarter of the city, and

 killed an estimated 83,000 people—a loss comparable to that later inﬂ icted by the atomic bombs. General MacArthur was also on the move. Completing the conquest of jungle-draped New Guinea, he headed northwest for the Philippines, en route to Japan, with 600 ships and 250,000 men. In a scene well staged for the photographers, he splashed ashore at Leyte Island on October 20, 1944, with the sum mons, “People of the Philippines, I have returned. . . . Rally to me.” Japan’s navy—still menacing—now made one lastchance effort to destroy MacArthur by wiping out his transports and supply ships. A gigantic clash at Leyte Gulf, fought on the sea and in the air, was actually three battles (October 23–26, 1944). The Americans won all of them, though the crucial engagement was almost lost when Admiral William F. (“Bull”) Halsey was decoyed away by a feint. Japan was through as a sea power: it had lost about sixty ships in the greatest naval battle of all time.



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 The Flag Raising at Iwo Jima Atop Mount Suribachi, press photographer Joe Rosenthal snapped this dramatic picture, probably the most famous of the war.

 American ﬂeets, numbering more than four thousand vessels, now commanded the western Paciﬁc. Several battleships, raised from the mud of Pearl Harbor, were exacting belated but sweet revenge. Overrunning Leyte, MacArthur next landed on the main Philippine island of Luzon in January 1945. Manila was his major objective; the ravaged city fell in March, but the Philippines were not conquered until July. Victory was purchased only after bitter ﬁghting against holed-in Japa nese, who took a toll of over sixty thousand American casualties. America’s steel vise was tightening mercilessly around Japan. The tiny island of Iwo Jima, needed as a haven for damaged American bombers returning from Japan, was captured in March 1945. This desperate twenty-ﬁve-day assault cost over four thousand American dead. Okinawa, a well-defended Japa nese island, was next on the list: it was needed for closer bases from

 which to blast and burn enemy cities and industries. Fighting dragged on from April to June of 1945. Japanese soldiers, ﬁghting with incredible courage from their caves, ﬁ nally sold Okinawa for ﬁ fty thousand American casualties, while suffering far heavier losses themselves. The U.S. Navy, which covered the invasion of Okinawa, sustained severe damage. Japa nese suicide pilots (“kamikazes”) in an exhibition of mass hara-kiri for their god-emperor, crashed their bomb-laden planes onto the decks of the invading ﬂeet. All told, the death squads sank over thirty ships and badly damaged scores more.

The Atomic Bombs
 Strategists in Washington were meanwhile planning an all-out invasion of the main islands of Japan—an

The Atomic Age


 invasion that presumably would cost hundreds of thousands of American (and even more Japa nese) casualties. Tokyo, recognizing imminent defeat, had secretly sent peace feelers to Moscow, which had not yet entered the Far Eastern war. The Americans, having broken the secret Japa nese radio codes, knew of these feelers. But bomb-scorched Japan still showed no outward willingness to surrender unconditionally to the Allies. The Potsdam conference, held near Berlin in July 1945, sounded the death knell of the Japa nese. There President Truman, still new on his job, met in a seventeen-day parley with Joseph Stalin and the British leaders. The conferees issued a stern ultimatum to Japan: surrender or be destroyed. American bombers showered the dire warning on Japan in tens of thousands of leaﬂets, but no encouraging response was forthcoming. America had a fantastic ace up its sleeve. Early in 1940, after Hitler’s wanton assault on Poland, Roosevelt was persuaded by American and exiled scientists, notably German-born Albert Einstein, to push



 The scientiﬁc director of the Manhattan Project, J. Robert Oppenheimer (1904–1967), recalled his reaction as he witnessed the detonation of the ﬁrst atomic bomb at the Trinity test site in Alamogordo, New Mexico, in July 1945. He was not only awed by the extraordinary force of this new weapon. He also feared the power to do harm that it gave to humans:

“


 I remembered the line from the Hindu scripture, the Bhagavad-Gita: ‘Now I am become Death, the destroyer of Worlds.’

”


 ahead with preparations for unlocking the secret of an atomic bomb. Congress, at Roosevelt’s blank-check request, blindly made available nearly $2 billion. Many military minds were skeptical of this “damned professor’s nonsense,” but fears that the Germans might ﬁ rst acquire such an awesome weapon provided a

 Hiroshima, Japan, August 1945 Two stunned survivors walk through the unbelievable destruction. The single atomic blast at Hiroshima killed an estimated 130,000 Japanese.



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 powerful spur to action. Ironically, Germany eventually abandoned its own atomic project as too costly. And as it happened, the war against Germany ended before the American weapon was ready. In a cruel twist of fate, Japan—not Germany, the original target— suffered the fate of being the ﬁ rst nation subjected to atomic bombardment. What was called the Manhattan Project pushed feverishly forward, as American know-how and industrial power were combined with the most advanced scientiﬁc knowledge. Much technical skill was provided by British and refugee scientists, who had ﬂed to

 America to escape the torture chambers of the dictators. Finally, in the desert near Alamogordo, New Mexico, on July 16, 1945, the experts detonated the ﬁ rst awesome and devastating atomic device. With Japan still refusing to surrender, the Potsdam threat was fulﬁ lled. On August 6, 1945, a lone American bomber dropped one atomic bomb on the city of Hiroshima, Japan. In a blinding ﬂash of death, followed by a funnel-shaped cloud, about 180,000 people were left killed, wounded, or missing. Some 70,000 of them died instantaneously. Sixty thousand more soon perished from burns and radiation disease.

 The Japanese Surrender Representatives of the Japanese government arrived to sign the surrender document on the deck of the battleship Missouri in Tokyo harbor, September 2, 1945. General Douglas MacArthur then made a conciliatory address, expressing hope “that from this solemn occasion a better world shall emerge . . . a world founded on faith and understanding.” A Japanese diplomat attending wondered “whether it would have been possible for us, had we been victorious, to embrace the vanquished with a similar magnanimity.” Soon thereafter General MacArthur took up his duties as director of the U.S. occupation of Japan.

The End of the War


 Two days later, on August 8, Stalin entered the war against Japan, exactly on the deadline date previously agreed upon with his allies. Soviet armies speedily overran the depleted Japa nese defenses in Manchuria and Korea in a six-day “victory parade” that involved several thousand Russian casualties. Stalin was evidently determined to be in on the kill, lest he lose a voice in the ﬁ nal division of Japan’s holdings. Fanatically resisting Japa nese, though facing atomization, still did not surrender. American aviators, on August 9, dropped a second atomic bomb on the city of Nagasaki. The explosion took a horrible toll of about eighty thousand people killed or missing. (See “Varying Viewpoints.”) The Japa nese nation could endure no more. On August 10, 1945, Tokyo sued for peace on one condition: that Hirohito, the bespectacled Son of Heaven, be allowed to remain on his ancestral throne

V-J
Day: Crowds Cheering at Times Square, by  Edward Dancig, 1947 Russian-born American artist Edward Dancig captured the feelings of triumph and relief that Americans felt at the end of World War II. His painting shows the V-J (Victory in Japan) Day celebration of August 15, 1945, in New York’s Times Square.



 as nominal emperor. Despite their “unconditional surrender” policy, the Allies accepted this condition on August 14, 1945. The Japa nese, though losing face, were able to save both their exalted ruler and what was left of their native land. The formal end came, with dramatic force, on September 2, 1945. Ofﬁcial surrender ceremonies were conducted by General MacArthur on the battleship Missouri in Tokyo Bay. At the same time, Americans at home hysterically celebrated V-J (Victory in Japan) Day after the most horrible war in history had ended in mushrooming atomic clouds.

The Allies Triumphant
 World War II proved to be terribly costly. American forces suffered some 1 million casualties, more than one-third of which were deaths. Compared with other wars, the proportion killed by wounds and disease was sharply reduced, owing in part to the use of blood plasma and “miracle” drugs, notably penicillin. Yet heavy though American losses were, the Soviet allies suffered casualties many times greater—more than 25 million people killed. In grim testimony to the nature of modern warfare, World War II was the ﬁ rst war that killed more civilians than armed combatants (see “Thinking Globally: America and the World in Depression and War: A Study in Contrasts”). America was fortunate in emerging with its mainland virtually unscathed. Two Japa nese submarines, using shells and bombers, had rather harmlessly attacked the Cal i fornia and Oregon coast, and a few Japa nese ﬁ re-bomb balloons had drifted across the Paciﬁc, kill ing six civilians in Oregon. But that was about all. Much of the rest of the world was utterly destroyed and destitute. America alone was untouched and healthy—oiled and muscled like a prize bull, standing astride the world’s ruined landscape. This complex conﬂ ict was the best-fought war in America’s history. Though unprepared for it at the outset, the nation was better prepared than for the others, partly because it had begun to buckle on its armor about a year and a half before the war ofﬁcially began. It was actually ﬁghting German submarines in the Atlantic months before the explosion in the Paciﬁc at Pearl Harbor. In the end the United States showed itself to be resourceful, tough, adaptable—able to accommodate itself to the tactics of an enemy who was relentless and ruthless.

THINKING GLOBALLY

America and the World in Depression and War:
A
Study in Contrasts 

T


 he Great Depression of the 1930s was a monstrous, planetary-scale economic hurricane that wreaked havoc around the globe. All nations were walloped by its destructive force, but two were especially hard hit: the United States and Germany. In both countries production of goods declined by nearly 50 percent, and unemployment approached 25 percent. Also in both countries the depression discredited existing political regimes and created opportunities for new leadership to emerge. Fatefully, Germany got Adolf Hitler, while the United States got Franklin D. Roosevelt. Roosevelt and Hitler were of the same generation, both born in the 1880s. They came to power within weeks of each other—Hitler as Germany’s chancellor on January 30, 1933, and Roosevelt as U.S. president on March 4, 1933. Both achieved ofﬁce through democratic elections, though democracy soon withered under one’s hand and ﬂourished under the other’s. Roosevelt’s entire presidency unfolded under the looming threat, and eventually the armed challenge, of Hitler’s Nazi regime. FDR’s record, as well as the very character of American democracy in the mid-twentieth century, can only be properly understood in that larger context. Consider: In the spring of 1933, Roosevelt was coaxing legislation out of the Hundred Days Congress, forging labor unions and sundry ethnic and racial minorities into a long-lasting Democratic party coalition, and making innovative use of the radio to outﬂank the hostile media magnates who controlled the nation’s newspapers. In those same months, Hitler was dissolving German labor unions and ruthlessly censoring the German press. Soon he declared the Nazis the only legal political party in Germany and proceeded to impose on the German people a reign of terror cruelly enforced by the Gestapo, the Nazis’ grimly efﬁcient secret police. A year later, while Roosevelt worried about a possible political challenge from the swashbuckling Louisiana senator Huey P. Long, Hitler dispatched with his main Nazi rival, Ernst Röhm, by ordering his execution. The following year, 1935, Roosevelt shepherded his sweeping reform program through Congress, notably including the Social Security Act, which helped to usher millions of Americans into the mainstream of American life, especially members of the great immigrant communities that had arrived a generation or so earlier. “We are going to make a country,” Roosevelt said, “in which no one is left out.” That same year Hitler codiﬁed the Nazis’ viciously



 anti-Semitic policies in the notorious Nuremberg Laws, stripping German Jews of their citizenship, barring them from the professions and military ser vice, and prohibiting marriage between Jews and “Aryans” (deﬁned by the Nazis as a master race of non-Jewish Caucasians, especially those having Nordic features)—all gruesome steps on the road to the genocidal war-time Holocaust, which would eventually murder some six million Jews. Meanwhile, Hitler was relentlessly building his war machine, while FDR’s America clung stubbornly to its traditional isolationism. And when the great conﬂict of World War II ﬁnally erupted, Hitler’s Germany and Roosevelt’s America fought decidedly different wars. Indeed the United States’ experience in the war stands in vivid contrast to the experience of all other combatants, including not only Germany but also America’s allies in the “Grand Alliance.” Hitler’s vaunted “thousand-year Reich” lay in smoldering ruins at war’s end, his people dazed, demoralized, and starving. The strutting Führer had brewed a catastrophe

 Franklin Delano Roosevelt, Thirty-second President of the United States

Table 35.1 The Comparative Costs of World War II
Country
China
France
Poland
USSR
United Kingdom United States Germany (including Austria) Italy Japan 
Military Deaths


Civilian Deaths


2,000,000
250,000
123,000
10,000,000
300,000
405,399


7,750,000
350,000
6,000,000
17,000,000
60,600
6*


3,500,000
242,000
2,000,000


1,600,000
60,000
650,000


Government
Expenditures


Damage to
Civilian Property


 $192 billion $120 billion $317 billion

 $128 billion $5 billion

 $272 billion $94 billion

 $50–$75 billion

 *In the forty-eight states; additional civilian deaths occurred in Hawaii, Alaska, and the Philippines. Sources: World War II casualty estimates vary widely. The ﬁgures here are largely taken from David M. Kennedy, ed., The Library of Congress World War II Companion; I. C. B. Dear, ed., The Oxford Companion to the Second World War; Louis L. Snyder, Historical Guide to World War II; and John Ellis, World War II: A Statistical Survey.

 so vast that its conclusion seemed to sunder the web of time itself. Germans remember the moment of their surrender on May 7, 1945, as the Stunde null, or “zero hour,” when history’s clock came to a fearful halt. Elsewhere, even

 America’s main wartime partners, Great Britain and the Soviet Union, had paid a far greater price in blood and treasure than the United States. Uniquely among all the belligerents in World War II—perhaps uniquely in the history of warfare—the United States had managed to grow its civilian economy even while waging a hugely costly war. In Germany, Britain, and the Soviet Union, the civilian standard of living had gone down by approximately one-third. In the United States, the civilian economy had actually expanded by 15 percent, preparing the way for phenomenal prosperity in the postwar decades. And though 405,399 brave American ser vice members died in World War II, proportionate to population American losses were about one-third those of Britain and about one-sixtieth those of the Soviet Union, where some 10 million soldiers and a staggering 17 million civilians perished (see Table 35.1). By glaring contrast, in the forty-eight continental American states that had a star on the ﬂag in 1945, the U.S. civilian death toll due to enemy action was just six persons, all of them the victims of a crude Japanese balloon-borne ﬁrebomb that exploded in their faces near the hamlet of Bly, Oregon, on May 5, 1945. For all the misery that depression and war visited upon the United States, Americans could count their blessings that fortune had spared them the enormous deprivations and horrors that were all too common elsewhere. Yet some observers worried that America was now assuming leadership in a world where the depths of other peoples’ wounds and woes could scarcely be imagined.

German Chancellor Adolf Hitler






Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 American military leadership proved to be of the highest order. A new crop of war heroes emerged in brilliant generals like Eisenhower, MacArthur, and Marshall (chief of staff) and in imaginative admirals like Nimitz and Spruance. President Roosevelt and Prime Minister Churchill, as kindred spirits, collaborated closely in planning strategy. “It is fun to be in the same decade with you,” FDR once cabled Churchill. Industrial leaders were no less skilled, for marvels of production were performed almost daily. Assembly lines proved as important as battle lines, and victory went again to the side with the most smokestacks. The enemy was almost literally smothered by bayonets, bullets, bazookas, and bombs. Hitler and his Axis coconspirators had chosen to make war with machines, and the ingenious Yankees could ask for nothing bet-

 ter. They demonstrated again, as they had in World War I, that the American way of war was simply more— more men, more weapons, more machines, more technology, and more money than any enemy could hope to match. From 1940 to 1945, the output of American factories was simply phenomenal. As Winston Churchill remarked, “Nothing succeeds like excess.” Hermann Goering, a Nazi leader, had sneered, “The Americans can’t build planes—only electric iceboxes and razor blades.” Democracy had given its answer, as the dictators, despite long preparation, were overthrown and discredited. It is true that an unusual amount of direct control was exercised over the individual by the Washington authorities during the war emergency. But the American people preserved their precious liberties without serious impairment.

 CHRONOLOGY





 United States declares war on Japan Germany declares war on United States Randolph plans black march on Washington Fair Employment Practices Commission (FEPC) established Roosevelt delivers “Four Freedoms” speech Japa nese Americans sent to internment camps Japan conquers the Philippines Battle of the Coral Sea Battle of Midway United States invades North Africa Congress of Racial Equality (CORE) founded Allies hold Casablanca conference Allies invade Italy Smith-Connally Anti-Strike Act “Zoot-suit” riots in Los Angeles Race riot in Detroit Japa nese driven from Guadalcanal Tehran conference



Korematsu v. U.S.
 D-Day invasion of France Battle of the Marianas Roosevelt defeats Dewey for presidency

1944–


Battle of the Bulge




 Roosevelt dies; Truman assumes presidency Germany surrenders Battles of Iwo Jima and Okinawa Potsdam conference Atomic bombs dropped on Hiroshima and Nagasaki Yalta conference Japan surrenders

Varying Viewpoints


KEY TERMS ABC-1
agreement (875) Executive Order No. 9066 (876) War Production Board (WPB) (877) Ofﬁce of Price Administration (OPA) (880) National War Labor Board (NWLB) (880) Smith-Connally AntiStrike Act (880) WAACs (Women’s Army Auxiliary Corps) (881) WAVES (Women Accepted for Volunteer Emergency Service) (881) SPARs (U.S. Coast Guard Women’s Reserve) (881) 


PEOPLE TO KNOW
Bracero program (881) Fair Employment Practices Commission (FEPC) (883) Congress of Racial Equality (CORE) (884) Navajo code talkers (884) Midway, Battle of (887) D-Day (891) V-E (Victory in Europe) Day (897) Potsdam conference (899) Manhattan Project (900) V-J (Victory in Japan) Day (901) 
 Douglas MacArthur Chester Nimitz Dwight D. “Ike” Eisenhower

Harry S Truman
Albert Einstein


 The Atomic Bombs: Were They Justiﬁed?

N


 o episode of the World War II era has provoked sharper controversy than the atomic bombings of Japan in August 1945. Lingering moral misgivings about the nuclear incineration of Hiroshima and Nagasaki have long threatened to tarnish America’s crown of military victory. Some critics have accused the United States of racist motives because the bombs were dropped on a nonwhite people. Other commentators note that the Japa nese were already reeling on the verge of collapse by 1945, and therefore history’s most awful weapons—especially the second bomb, on Nagasaki—were unnecessary to bring the war to a conclusion. Still other scholars, notably Gar Alperovitz, have further charged that the atomic attacks on

 Hiroshima and Nagasaki were not the last shots of World War II, but the ﬁ rst salvos in the emerging Cold War. Alperovitz argues that President Truman willfully ignored Tokyo’s attempts to negotiate a surrender in the summer of 1945 and rejected all alternatives to dropping the bomb because he wanted to intimidate and isolate the Soviet Union. He unleashed his horrible new weapons, so this argument goes, not simply to defeat Japan, but to end the Far Eastern conﬂ ict before the Soviets could enter it, and thereby freeze them out of any role in formulating postwar reconstruction policy in Asia. Each of these accusations has been vigorously rebutted. Richard Rhodes’s exhaustive history of the



Chapter 35 America in World War II, 1941–1945


 making of the atomic bomb emphasizes that the Anglo-American atomic project began as a race against the Germans, who were known to be actively pursuing a nuclear weapons program. (Unknown to the Americans, Germany effectively terminated its effort in 1942, just as the Anglo-American project went into high gear.) From the outset both British and American planners believed that the bomb, if successful, would be not just another weapon, but the ultimate instrument of destruction that would decisively deliver victory into the hands of whoever possessed it. They consequently assumed that it would be used at the earliest possible moment. There is, therefore, no credible reason to conclude that German cities would not have suffered the fate of Hiroshima and Nagasaki if nuclear weapons had become available sooner or if the European phase of the war had lasted longer. It is true that American intelligence sources in the early summer of 1945 reported that some Japanese statesmen were trying to enlist the still-neutral Russians’ good ofﬁces to negotiate a surrender. But as R. J. C. Butow’s ﬁ ne-grained study of Japan’s decision to surrender demonstrates, it was unclear whether those initiatives had the full backing of the Japa nese government. Moreover, the Japa nese clung to several unacceptable conditions, including protection for their imperial system of government, the right to disarm and repatriate their own troops, no military occupation of the home islands, no international trials of alleged war criminals, and possible retention of some of their conquered territories. All this ﬂew squarely in the face of America’s repeatedly declared intention to settle for nothing less than unconditional surrender. As for the Nagasaki bomb (dropped on August 9), Butow also notes that it conclusively dispelled the Japa nese government’s original assessment that the Hiroshima attack (on Aug ust 6) was a one-time-only stunt, with little likelihood of further nuclear strikes to follow. (Even then, some diehard military ofﬁcers, refusing to ac-

 knowledge defeat, tried, on the night of August 14, to storm the Imperial Palace to seize the recording of the emperor’s surrender announcement before it could be broadcast the following day.) Could the use of the atomic bombs have been avoided? Studies by Martin J. Sherwin, Barton J. Bernstein, and McGeorge Bundy have shown that few policymakers at the time seriously asked that question. As Winston Churchill later wrote, “The decision whether or not to use the atomic bomb to compel the surrender of Japan was never even an issue. There was unanimous, automatic, unquestioned agreement around our table; nor did I ever hear the slightest suggestion that we should do otherwise.” In fact, the “decision” to use the bomb was not made in 1945, but in 1942, when the United States committed itself to a crash program to build—and use—a nuclear weapon as swiftly as possible. Intimidating the Soviets might have been a “bonus” to using the bomb against Japan, but inﬂuencing Soviet behavior was never the primary reason for the fateful decision. American leaders wanted to end the war as soon as possible. To that end they had always assumed the atomic bomb would be dropped as soon as it was available. That moment came on August 6, 1945. Doubt and remorse about the atomic conclusion of World War II have plagued the American conscience ever since. Less often remarked on are the deaths of four times more Japa nese noncombatants than died at Hiroshima and Nagasaki in the so-called conventional ﬁ rebombing of some ﬁve dozen Japa nese cities in 1945. Those deaths suggest that the deeper moral question should perhaps be addressed not to the particular technology of nuclear weaponry and the fate of those two unfortunate Japa nese cit ies, but to the quite deliberate decision, made by several combatants—including the Germans, the British, the Americans, and the Japanese themselves—to designate civilian populations as legitimate military targets.

To Learn More




To Learn More
Kai Bird and Martin J. Sherwin, American Prometheus: The
Triumph and Tragedy of J. Robert Oppenheimer (2005)
John M. Blum, V Was for Victory: Politics and American
Culture During World War II (1976)
Roger Daniels, Prisoners Without Trial: Japanese Americans
 in World War II (1993) Norman Davies, No Simple Victory: World War II in Europe, 1939–1945 (2007) John W. Dower, War Without Mercy: Race and Power in the Paciﬁc War (1986) Sherna Gluck, Rosie the Riveter Revisited: Women, the War, and Social Change (1988) Nelson Lichtenstein, Labor’s War at Home: The CIO in World War II (1982)

Richard Rhodes, The Making of the Atomic Bomb (1986)
Ronald H. Spector, Eagle Against the Sun: The American
 War with Japan (1985) Ronald T. Takaki, Double Victory: A Multicultural History of America in World War II (2000)

 A complete, annotated bibliography for this chapter—along with brief descriptions of the People to Know and additional review materials—may be found at www.cengage.com/history/kennedy/ampageant14e

 PART

 SIX

Making Modern
America





1945 to the Present


W


 orld War II broke the back of the Great Depression in the United States and also ended the century-and-a-half-old Amer ican tradition of isolationism in foreign affairs. Alone among the warring powers, the United States managed to emerge from the great conﬂ ict physically unscarred, economically healthy, and diplomatically strengthened. Yet if Americans faced a world full of promise at the war’s end, it was also a world full of dangers, none more disconcerting than Soviet communism. These two themes of promise and menace mingled uneasily throughout the nearly ﬁve decades of the Cold War era, from the end of World War II in 1945 to the collapse of the Soviet Union in 1991. At home unprecedented prosperity in the post war quarter-century nourished a robust sense of national self-conﬁdence and fed a revolution of rising expectations. Invigorated by the prospect of endlessly spread-

 ing afﬂuence, Americans in the 1940s, 1950s, and 1960s had record numbers of babies, aspired to everhigher standards of liv ing, generously expanded the welfare state (especially for the elderly), widened opportunities for women, welcomed immigrants, and even found the will to grapple at long last with the nation’s grossest legacy of injustice, its treatment of African Amer icans. With the exception of Dwight Eisenhower’s presidency in the 1950s, Americans elected liberal Democratic presidents (Harry Truman in 1948, John F. Kennedy in 1960, and Lyndon Johnson in 1964). The Democratic party, the party of the liberal New Deal at home and of an activist foreign policy abroad, comfortably remained the nation’s majority party. Americans trusted their government and had faith in the American dream that their children would lead a richer life than their parents had done. Anything and every thing seemed possible.

The Suburban Society
 In the phenomenally afﬂuent post–World War II years, newly prosperous Americans ﬂocked to the freshly built suburbs.

Making Modern America


 The rising curve of ascending expectations, propelled by exploding economic growth, bounded upward throughout the 1950s. It peaked in the 1960s, an exceptionally stormy decade during which faith in government, in the wisdom of American foreign policy, and in the American dream itself, began to sour. Lyndon Johnson’s “Great Society” reforms, billed as the completion of the unﬁ nished work of the New Deal, foundered on the rocks of ﬁscal limitations and stubborn racial resentments. Johnson, the most ambitious reformer in the White House since Franklin Roosevelt, eventually saw his presidency destroyed by the furies unleashed over the Vietnam War. When economic growth ﬂattened in the 1970s, the horizon of hopes for the future seemed to sink as well. The nation entered a frustrating period of stalled expectations, increasingly rancorous racial tensions, disillusion with government, and political stalemate, although in one important arena idealism survived. As “second-wave feminism” gathered steam, women burst through barriers that had long excluded them from male domains operating every where from the factory ﬂoor to the U.S. Army to the Ivy League. Not content with private victories, they also called on the government for help—to ensure women equal opportunity as workers, fair treatment as consumers, and the right to choose an abortion. Beginning in 1968, Americans stopped sending New Deal–style liberals to the White House, electing moderate Republicans (Richard Nixon in 1968 and 1972, succeeded by the unelected Gerald Ford after Watergate), moderate southern Democrats (Jimmy Carter in 1976 and Bill Clinton in 1992 and 1996), and conser vative Republicans (Ronald Reagan in 1980 and 1984, George H. W. Bush in 1992, and George W. Bush in 2000 and 2004). Throughout most of these years, Congress remained mostly under the Democrats’ control, until the “Republican revolution” of 1994 put a new generation of conser vative legislators in power. Only with popular discontent over the Iraq War did the Democrats narrowly regain control of both houses in 2006. As the twenty-ﬁrst century dawned, the Democratic party teetered on a tightrope between liberal policies and conser vative demands for tax cuts, reduced government regulation, and welfare reform.



 The End of an Era? As surely as victory in World War II restored conﬁdence and prosperity to a people demoralized by the Great Depression, the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, struck electric fear into the American people— and menaced their historical commitment to an open society and individual liberties.

 And by the 2008 election, a Republican party that had seemed to be solidly uniﬁed around a conser vative agenda started to fracture into defense hawks, social conservatives, and ﬁscal moderates. Abroad the ﬁerce competition with the Soviet Union, and after 1949 with communist China as well, colored almost every aspect of America’s foreign relations and shaped domestic life, too. Unreasoning fear of communists at home unleashed the destructive force of McCarthyism in the 1950s—a modern-day witch hunt in which careers were capsized and lives ruined by reckless accusations of communist sympathizing. The FBI encroached on sacred American liberties in its zeal to uncover communist “subversives.” The Cold War remained cold, in the sense that no shooting conﬂ ict broke out between the great-power rivals. But the United States did ﬁght two shooting wars, in Korea in the 1950s and Vietnam in the 1960s. Vietnam, the only foreign war in which the United States has ever been defeated, cruelly convulsed American society, ending not only Lyndon Johnson’s presidency but the thirty-ﬁve-year era of the Democratic party’s political dominance as well. Vietnam also touched off the most vicious inﬂationary cycle in American history, and embittered and disillusioned an entire generation. Uncle Sam in the Cold War era built a fearsome— and expensive—arsenal of nuclear weapons, great air and missile ﬂeets to deliver them, a two-ocean navy, and, for a time, a large army raised by conscription. When the Cold War ended, Americans turned to the promise of an information age in a global economy. But terrorist attacks on American soil in 2001 shifted the country’s attention back to national defense and international military strategy, launching two wars and fundamentally transforming both foreign and domestic politics.

The Cold War Begins





1945–1952
 The United States stand at this moment at the summit of the world. WINSTON CHURCHILL, 1945

T


 he American people, 140 million strong, cheered their nation’s victories in Europe and Asia at the conclusion of World War II. But before the shouting had even faded, many Americans began to worry about their future. Four ﬁery years of global war had not entirely driven from their minds the painful memories of twelve desperate years of the Great Depression. Still more ominously, victory celebrations had barely ended before America’s crumbling relations with its wartime ally, the Soviet Union, threatened a new and even more terrible international conﬂ ict.

Postwar Economic Anxieties
 The decade of the 1930s had left deep scars. Joblessness and insecurity had pushed up the suicide rate and dampened the marriage rate. Babies went unborn as pinched budgets and sagging self-esteem wrought a sexual depression in American bedrooms. The war had banished the blight of depression, but would the respite last? Grim-faced observers were warning that

 the war had only temporarily lifted the pall of economic stagnation and that peace would bring the return of hard times. Homeward-bound GIs, so the gloomy predictions ran, would step out of the army’s chow lines and back into the breadlines of the unemployed. The faltering economy in the initial postwar years threatened to conﬁ rm the worst predictions of the doomsayers who foresaw another Great Depression. Real gross national product (GNP) slumped sickeningly in 1946 and 1947 from its wartime peak. With the removal of wartime price controls, prices giddily levitated by 33 percent in 1946–1947. An epidemic of strikes swept the country. During 1946 alone some 4.6 million laborers laid down their tools, fearful that soon they could barely afford the autos and other goods they were manufacturing. The growing muscle of orga nized labor deeply annoyed many conser vatives. They had their revenge against labor’s New Deal gains in 1947, when a Republican-controlled Congress (the ﬁ rst in fourteen years) passed the Taft-Hartley Act over President Truman’s vigorous veto. Labor leaders condemned the

 This icon will direct you to interactive activities and study materials on The American Pageant website: www.cengage.com/history/kennedy/ampageant14e



Economic Uncertainty




Going to College on the GI
 Bill Financed by the federal government, thousands of World War II veterans crowded into college classrooms in the late 1940s. Universities struggled to house these older students, many of whom already had families. Pennsylvania State College resorted to setting up hundreds of trailers.

 Taft-Hartley Act as a “slave-labor law.” It outlawed the “closed” (all-union) shop, made unions liable for damages that resulted from jurisdictional disputes among themselves, and required union leaders to take a noncommunist oath. Taft-Hartley was only one of several obstacles that slowed the growth of orga nized labor in the years after World War II. In the heady days of the New Deal, unions had spread swiftly in the industrialized Northeast, especially in huge manufacturing industries like steel and automobiles. But labor’s postwar efforts to organize in the historically antiunion regions of the South and West proved frustrating. The CIO’s Operation Dixie, aimed at unionizing southern textile workers and steelworkers, failed miserably in 1948 to overcome lingering fears of racial mixing. And workers in the rapidly growing ser vice sector of the economy—many of them middle-aged women, often working only part-time in small shops, widely separated from one another—proved much more difﬁcult to organize than the thousands of assembly-line workers who in the 1930s had poured into the auto and steel unions. Union membership would peak in the 1950s and then begin a long, unremitting decline. The Democratic administration meanwhile took some steps of its own to forestall an economic downturn. It sold war factories and other government installations to private businesses at ﬁ re-sale prices. It

 secured passage of the Employment Act of 1946, making it government policy “to promote maximum employment, production, and purchasing power.” The act created a three-member Council of Economic Advisers to provide the president with the data and the recommendations to make that policy a reality. Most dramatic was the passage of the Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944—better known as the GI Bill of Rights, or the GI Bill. Enacted partly out of fear that the employment markets would never be able to absorb 15 million returning veterans at war’s end, the GI Bill made generous provisions for sending the former soldiers to school. In the postwar decade, some 8 million veterans advanced their education at Uncle Sam’s expense. The majority attended technical and vocational schools, but colleges and universities were crowded to the blackboards as more than 2 million ex-GIs stormed the halls of higher learning. The total eventually spent for education was some $14.5 billion in taxpayer dollars. The act also enabled the Veterans Administration (VA) to guarantee about $16 billion in loans for veterans to buy homes, farms, and small businesses. By raising educational levels and stimulating the construction industry, the GI Bill powerfully nurtured the robust and long-lived economic expansion that eventually took hold in the late 1940s and that profoundly shaped the entire history of the postwar era.



